Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2761.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; infrastructure study; Cornville Road The sum of $300,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to conduct an infrastructure study for traffic improvements on Cornville Road.